Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the agricultural economy in Washington state is struggling for viability. A recent study from the United States department of agriculture found that Washington state farmers come in last with regard to farm income; in fact, Washington agriculture had a negative income this year. Over the last four years, the income to Washington farmers has steadily decreased. Washington farmers raise over 300 different crops and Washington agriculture is one of the top industries in the state. In 2023, Washington's agricultural production was worth nearly $14,000,000,000. However, with an average of two farms a day closing since 2017, agriculture in Washington can hardly persist.(2) The legislature further finds that increasing costs of government regulation is a key component of the overwhelming stress faced by the industry.(3) Therefore, the legislature intends that regulatory agencies whose actions most affect agriculture need to consider the effect of their rules and enforcement actions on agriculture. The viability of agriculture has not been a part of rule-making analysis before now, but in order to preserve this economy in Washington state, the legislature finds that it is crucial to ensure that the government is not causing more harm to the industry.(4) The food policy forum has made several recommendations to protect agriculture and agricultural land. In the 2022 report "Land Use Policy Solutions to Stem Agricultural Land Loss," the forum recommends a series of agricultural impact statements before actions that could lead to the loss of land in agriculture. According to the report, 640,000 acres of land in farms was lost between 2002 and 2017. This loss is devastating to the industry and to the ability of the next generation to continue farming. The legislature finds that a combination of impact statements and mitigation is an essential tool to preserve farmland, and thereby the continued viability of agriculture.(5) Therefore:(a) The legislature declares that it is the continuing policy of the state of Washington, in cooperation with federal and local governments and other concerned public and private organizations, to use all practicable means and measures, including financial and technical assistance, in a manner calculated to:(i) Promote a stable food supply by maintaining a healthy agricultural economy in Washington state; and(ii) Ensure that the regulatory environment does not adversely affect the ability of Washington's farmers to continue to grow and sell their products to feed citizens of Washington state and the world.(b) In order to carry out the policy set forth in this act, it is the continuing responsibility of the state of Washington, particularly the state agencies that affect the use of natural resources, namely the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the state conservation commission, the department of ecology, the forest practices board, the department of labor and industries, and the department of commerce, to use all practicable means, consistent with other essential considerations of state policy, to improve and coordinate plans, functions, programs, and resources in order to:(i) Promote agriculture while protecting public health and welfare and the environment;(ii) Provide opportunities for farmers and ranchers to utilize agricultural land to produce agricultural products;(iii) Aid farmers and landowners in utilizing the land for the best combination of production, habitat, carbon sequestration, and any combination of commercial and conservation activities;(iv) Preserve historical, cultural, and natural aspects of our national heritage of agriculture;(v) Balance the requirements of chapters 36.70A and 43.21C RCW, and other environmental policies of the state with the future viability of agriculture.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The legislature authorizes and directs that, to the fullest extent possible, the policies, regulations, and laws of the state of Washington shall be interpreted and administered in accordance with the policies set forth in this chapter and that the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of ecology, the forest practices board, the department of labor and industries, or the department of commerce shall:(1) Utilize systematic, interdisciplinary approaches, methods, and procedures to ensure the integrated use of the natural and social sciences in planning and decision making with respect to issues that have an impact on the agricultural economy in Washington state;(2) Identify and develop methods and procedures, in consultation with the department and the state conservation commission, which will ensure that the viability of agricultural activities will be given appropriate consideration in decision-making, along with regulatory requirements, economic, and technical considerations;(3)(a) Include in every recommendation or report on proposals for agency request legislation, legislative reports, rule-making actions, or policy development that significantly affect agriculture, an agricultural impact statement developed by the director or the director's designee regarding:(i) The economic impact of the proposed action on the conduct of agriculture in Washington;(ii) Any adverse effects that cannot be avoided should the proposal be implemented;(iii) Alternatives to the proposed action;(iv) The qualitative or quantitative relationship between local short-term uses of the environment and the maintenance and enhancement of long-term agricultural productivity;(v) Any irreversible and irretrievable commitments of resources that would be involved in the proposed action should it be implemented; and(vi) Any proposals to mitigate potential impacts;(b) Before making any detailed statement, the responsible official or the official's designee shall request consultation with and obtain comments from an economist employed by a land grant university or the department; and(4) Study, develop, and describe appropriate alternatives to recommended courses of action in any proposed action that involves unresolved conflicts concerning alternative uses of available resources, including mitigation required in section 4 of this act for any loss of use of land or loss of commercial opportunities due to any agency action.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1)(a) The director of financial management or the director's designee, in cooperation with appropriate legislative committees and legislative staff, must establish a mechanism for the determination of the fiscal impact of proposed legislation that, if enacted into law, would directly or indirectly increase or decrease regulatory costs incurred by entities engaged in agriculture. The office of financial management shall, when requested by a member of the state legislature, report in writing as to the fiscal impact and the report may be known as a fiscal note. The office of financial management must consult with an agricultural economist employed by the department for an accurate depiction of economic impacts to agriculture in Washington.(b) For purposes of this subsection, "entities engaged in agriculture" includes entities registered with the office of the secretary of state as engaged in the manufacturing, production, or processing of agricultural products.(2) Fiscal notes must indicate by fiscal year the total impact on the agricultural economy for the first two years the legislation would be in effect and also a cumulative six-year forecast of the fiscal impact. Where feasible and applicable, the fiscal note must also indicate the fiscal impact on each industry or a representative sampling of the industry broadly.(3) A fiscal note must be provided only upon request of a member of the state legislature. A request for a fiscal note on legislation is considered to be a continuing request for a fiscal note on any formal alteration of the legislation in the form of an amendment to the legislation that is adopted by a committee or a chamber of the legislature or a substitute version of the legislation that is adopted by a committee and preparation of the fiscal note on the prior version of the legislation must stop, unless the legislator requesting the fiscal note specifies otherwise or the altered version is first adopted or enacted in the last week of a legislative session.(4) Fiscal notes must be completed within one week of the request unless an extended time period is authorized by the requesting legislator. In the event a fiscal note has not been completed within one week of a request, a daily report must be prepared for the requesting legislator by the director of financial management. The daily report must summarize the progress in preparing the fiscal note. If the request is referred to the director of agriculture, the daily report must also include the date and time such referral was made.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. If the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of ecology, the forest practices board, or the department of commerce proposes an action that will result in the deprivation of the beneficial use of the real property to such an extent that the deprivation results in the loss of financial benefit from the current or future use of property engaged in agriculture or other natural resourced based commercial activities, the department proposing the action must propose mitigation measures in the following sequence:(1) Avoidance of impacts through technical assistance or amendment of such proposal;(2) Where avoidance of adverse impacts is not reasonably attainable, minimizing impacts by providing permanent access to replacement acreage either from state land controlled by that agency or in cooperation with other agencies that control access to state lands;(3) Where avoidance and minimization are not reasonably attainable, compensating for adverse impacts by providing in-kind mitigation or financial compensation for lost property from the habitat conservation account established in RCW 79A.15.040.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This chapter may be known and cited as the food economics, availability, and security over time act.Sec. 6. RCW 79A.15.040 and 2021 c 209 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter prior to July 1, 2016, to the habitat conservation account shall be distributed in the following way:(a) Not less than ((forty))40 percent through June 30, 2011, at which time the amount shall become ((forty-five))45 percent, for the acquisition and development of critical habitat;(b) Not less than ((thirty))30 percent for the acquisition and development of natural areas;(c) Not less than ((twenty))20 percent for the acquisition and development of urban wildlife habitat; and(d) Not less than ((ten))10 percent through June 30, 2011, at which time the amount shall become five percent, shall be used by the board to fund restoration and enhancement projects on state lands. Only the department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife may apply for these funds to be used on existing habitat and natural area lands.(2) Moneys appropriated beginning July 1, 2016, for this chapter to the habitat conservation account shall be distributed in the following way:(a) Not less than ((thirty-five))35 percent for the acquisition and development of critical habitat;(b) Not less than ((twenty-five))25 percent for the acquisition and development of natural areas;(c) Not less than ((fifteen))15 percent for the acquisition or enhancement or restoration of riparian habitat;(d) Not less than ((fifteen))15 percent for the acquisition and development of urban wildlife habitat; and(e) Not less than ((ten))10 percent or ((three million dollars))$3,000,000, whichever is less, for the board to fund restoration and enhancement projects on state lands. Any amount above ((three million dollars))$3,000,000 must be distributed for the purposes of (c) of this subsection.(3)(a) In distributing these funds, the board retains discretion to meet the most pressing needs for critical habitat, natural areas, riparian protection, and urban wildlife habitat, and is not required to meet the percentages described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section in any one biennium.(b) If not enough project applications are submitted in a category within the habitat conservation account to meet the percentages described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section in any biennium, the board retains discretion to distribute any remaining funds to the other categories within the account or to fund the requirements of section 4(3) of this act in this account.(4) State agencies and nonprofit nature conservancies may apply for acquisition and development funds for natural areas projects under subsection (1)(b) of this section.(5) State and local agencies and nonprofit nature conservancies may apply for acquisition and development funds for critical habitat, urban wildlife habitat, and riparian protection projects under this section. Other state agencies not defined in RCW 79A.15.010, such as the department of transportation and the department of corrections, may enter into interagency agreements with state agencies to apply in partnership for riparian protection funds under this section.(6) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the state parks and recreation commission may apply for restoration and enhancement funds to be used on existing state-owned lands.(7)(a) Any lands that have been acquired with grants under this section by the department of fish and wildlife are subject to an amount in lieu of real property taxes and an additional amount for control of noxious weeds as determined by RCW 77.12.203.(b) Any lands that have been acquired with grants under this section by the department of natural resources are subject to payments in the amounts required under the provisions of RCW 79.70.130 and 79.71.130.(8) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 79A.15.140 or 79A.15.150, the board in its evaluating process shall consider the following in determining distribution priority:(a) Whether the entity applying for funding is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010;(b) Effective one calendar year following the development and statewide availability of urban forestry management plans and ordinances under RCW 76.15.090, whether the entity receiving assistance has been recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the evergreen community designation program created in RCW 76.15.090; and(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.(9) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW to read as follows:Within 30 days after the filing of a city's or town's annexation resolution pursuant to RCW 35.13.015 with the board of county commissioners or within 30 days after filing with the county commissioners a petition calling for an election on annexation, as provided in RCW 35.13.020, or within 30 days after approval by the legislative body of a city or town of a petition of property owners calling for annexation, as provided in RCW 35.13.130, the city or town shall complete an agricultural impact statement as described in section 2(3)(a) of this act to determine whether the property to be annexed is of agricultural significance.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:A city or town must complete an agricultural impact statement as described in section 2(3)(a) of this act before adopting a zoning amendment changing the designation from agriculture to some other designation. If the zoning amendment results in the loss of agricultural land, the change in designation must be mitigated by conserving adjacent farmland that is comparable in size, soil quality, and agricultural value. If adjacent farmland is not available, farmland in other areas or unfarmed land restored to production may be used for mitigation at a rate of three acres for every acre lost.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW to read as follows:Within 30 days after the filing of a charter code city's or noncharter code city's annexation resolution pursuant to RCW 35A.14.015 with the board of county commissioners or within 30 days after filing with the county commissioners a petition calling for an election on annexation, as provided in RCW 35A.14.020, or within 30 days after approval by the legislative body of a charter code city or noncharter code city of a petition of property owners calling for annexation, as provided in RCW 35A.14.120, the charter code city or noncharter code city shall complete an agricultural impact statement as described in section 2(3)(a) of this act to determine whether the property to be annexed is of agricultural significance.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:A code city must complete an agricultural impact statement as described in section 2(3)(a) of this act before adopting a zoning amendment changing the designation from agriculture to some other designation. If the zoning amendment results in the loss of agricultural land, the change in designation must be mitigated by conserving adjacent farmland that is comparable in size, soil quality, and agricultural value. If adjacent farmland is not available, farmland in other areas or unfarmed land restored to production may be used for mitigation at a rate of three acres for every acre lost.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:A county must complete an agricultural impact statement as described in section 2(3)(a) of this act before adopting a zoning amendment changing the designation from agriculture to some other designation. If the zoning amendment results in the loss of agricultural land, the change in designation must be mitigated by conserving adjacent farmland that is comparable in size, soil quality, and agricultural value. If adjacent farmland is not available, farmland in other areas or unfarmed land restored to production may be used for mitigation at a rate of three acres for every acre lost.Sec. 12. RCW 36.70A.110 and 2025 c 258 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall designate an urban growth area or areas within which urban growth shall be encouraged and outside of which growth can occur only if it is not urban in nature. Each city that is located in such a county shall be included within an urban growth area. An urban growth area may include more than a single city. An urban growth area may include territory that is located outside of a city only if such territory already is characterized by urban growth whether or not the urban growth area includes a city, or is adjacent to territory already characterized by urban growth, or is a designated new fully contained community as defined by RCW 36.70A.350. When a federally recognized Indian tribe whose reservation or ceded lands lie within the county or city has voluntarily chosen to participate in the planning process pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040, the county or city and the tribe shall coordinate their planning efforts for any areas planned for urban growth consistent with the terms outlined in the memorandum of agreement provided for in RCW 36.70A.040(8).(2) Based upon the growth management population projection made for the county by the office of financial management, the county and each city within the county shall include areas and densities sufficient to permit the urban growth that is projected to occur in the county or city for the succeeding ((twenty-year))20-year period, except for those urban growth areas contained totally within a national historical reserve. As part of this planning process, each city within the county must include areas sufficient to accommodate the broad range of needs and uses that will accompany the projected urban growth including, as appropriate, medical, governmental, institutional, commercial, service, retail, and other nonresidential uses.Each urban growth area shall permit urban densities and shall include greenbelt and open space areas. In the case of urban growth areas contained totally within a national historical reserve, the city may restrict densities, intensities, and forms of urban growth as determined to be necessary and appropriate to protect the physical, cultural, or historic integrity of the reserve. An urban growth area determination may include a reasonable land market supply factor and shall permit a range of urban densities and uses. In determining this market factor, cities and counties may consider local circumstances. Cities and counties have discretion in their comprehensive plans to make many choices about accommodating growth.Within one year of July 1, 1990, each county that as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, shall begin consulting with each city located within its boundaries and each city shall propose the location of an urban growth area. Within ((sixty))60 days of the date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its resolution of intention or of certification by the office of financial management, all other counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall begin this consultation with each city located within its boundaries. The county shall attempt to reach agreement with each city on the location of an urban growth area within which the city is located. If such an agreement is not reached with each city located within the urban growth area, the county shall justify in writing why it so designated the area an urban growth area. A city may object formally with the department over the designation of the urban growth area within which it is located. Where appropriate, the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts, including the use of mediation services.(3) Urban growth should be located first in areas already characterized by urban growth that have adequate existing public facility and service capacities to serve such development, second in areas already characterized by urban growth that will be served adequately by a combination of both existing public facilities and services and any additional needed public facilities and services that are provided by either public or private sources, and third in the remaining portions of the urban growth areas. Urban growth may also be located in designated new fully contained communities as defined by RCW 36.70A.350.(4) In general, cities are the units of local government most appropriate to provide urban governmental services. In general, it is not appropriate that urban governmental services be extended to or expanded in rural areas except in those limited circumstances shown to be necessary to protect basic public health and safety and the environment and when such services are financially supportable at rural densities and do not permit urban development and as authorized in RCW 36.70A.830.(5) On or before October 1, 1993, each county that was initially required to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) shall adopt development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this chapter. Within three years and three months of the date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its resolution of intention or of certification by the office of financial management, all other counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this chapter. Adoption of the interim urban growth areas may only occur after public notice; public hearing; and compliance with the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and under this section. Such action may be appealed to the growth management hearings board under RCW 36.70A.280. Final urban growth areas shall be adopted at the time of comprehensive plan adoption under this chapter.(6) Each county shall include designations of urban growth areas in its comprehensive plan.(7) An urban growth area designated in accordance with this section may include within its boundaries urban service areas or potential annexation areas designated for specific cities or towns within the county.(8) If, during the county's annual review under RCW 36.70A.130(2)(a), the county determines revision of the urban growth area is not required to accommodate the population projection for the county made by the office of financial management for the succeeding 20-year period, but does determine that patterns of development have created pressure for development in areas exceeding the amount of available developable lands within the urban growth area, then the county may revise the urban growth area or areas based on identified patterns of development and likely future development pressure if the following requirements are met:(a) The revised urban growth area would not result in a net increase in the total acreage or development capacity of the urban growth area or areas;(b) The county completes an agricultural impact statement as described in section 2(3)(a) of this act if the revised urban growth area contains land that is currently zoned for agricultural use;(c) The areas added to the urban growth area are not designated by the county as agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands of long-term commercial significance;(((c)))(d) If the areas added to the urban growth area have previously been designated as agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands of long-term commercial significance, either an equivalent amount of agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands of long-term commercial significance must be added to the area outside of the urban growth area, or the county must wait a minimum of two years before another swap may occur;(((d)))(e) Less than 15 percent of the areas added to the urban growth area are critical areas other than critical aquifer recharge areas. Critical aquifer recharge areas must have been previously designated by the county and be maintained per county development regulations within the expanded urban growth area and the revised urban growth area must not result in a net increase in critical aquifer recharge areas within the urban growth area;(((e)))(f) The areas added to the urban growth areas are suitable for urban growth;(((f)))(g) The transportation element and capital facility plan element of the county's comprehensive plan have identified the transportation facilities and public facilities and services needed to serve the urban growth area and the funding to provide the transportation facilities and public facilities and services;(((g)))(h) The areas removed from the urban growth area are not characterized by urban growth or urban densities;(((h)))(i) The revised urban growth area is contiguous, does not include holes or gaps, and will not increase pressures to urbanize rural or natural resource lands;(((i)))(j) The county's proposed urban growth area revision has been reviewed according to the process and procedure in the countywide planning policies adopted and approved according to RCW 36.70A.210; and(((j)))(k) The revised urban growth area meets all other requirements of this section.(9)(a) At the earliest possible date prior to the revision of the county's urban growth area authorized under subsection (8) of this section, the county must engage in meaningful consultation with any federally recognized Indian tribe that may be potentially affected by the proposed revision. Meaningful consultation must include discussion of the potential impacts to cultural resources and tribal treaty rights.(b) A county must notify the affected federally recognized Indian tribe of the proposed revision using at least two methods, including by mail. Upon receiving a notice, the federally recognized Indian tribe may request a consultation to determine whether an agreement can be reached related to the revision of the county's urban growth area. If an agreement is not reached, the parties must enter mediation pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040.(10)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the expansion of an urban growth area is prohibited into the ((one hundred year))100-year floodplain of any river or river segment that: (i) Is located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains; and (ii) has a mean annual flow of one thousand or more cubic feet per second as determined by the department of ecology.(b) Subsection (10)(a) of this section does not apply to:(i) Urban growth areas that are fully contained within a floodplain and lack adjacent buildable areas outside the floodplain;(ii) Urban growth areas where expansions are precluded outside floodplains because:(A) Urban governmental services cannot be physically provided to serve areas outside the floodplain; or(B) Expansions outside the floodplain would require a river or estuary crossing to access the expansion; or(iii) Urban growth area expansions where:(A) Public facilities already exist within the floodplain and the expansion of an existing public facility is only possible on the land to be included in the urban growth area and located within the floodplain; or(B) Urban development already exists within a floodplain as of July 26, 2009, and is adjacent to, but outside of, the urban growth area, and the expansion of the urban growth area is necessary to include such urban development within the urban growth area; or(C) The land is owned by a jurisdiction planning under this chapter or the rights to the development of the land have been permanently extinguished, and the following criteria are met:(I) The permissible use of the land is limited to one of the following: Outdoor recreation; environmentally beneficial projects((,)) including, but not limited to, habitat enhancement or environmental restoration; stormwater facilities; flood control facilities; or underground conveyances; and(II) The development and use of such facilities or projects will not decrease flood storage, increase stormwater runoff, discharge pollutants to fresh or salt waters during normal operations or floods, or increase hazards to people and property.(c) For the purposes of this subsection (10), "((one hundred year))100-year floodplain" means the same as "special flood hazard area" as set forth in WAC 173-158-040 as it exists on July 26, 2009.(11) If a county, city, or utility has adopted a capital facility plan or utilities element to provide sewer service within the urban growth areas during the ((twenty-year))20-year planning period, nothing in this chapter obligates counties, cities, or utilities to install sanitary sewer systems to properties within urban growth areas designated under subsection (2) of this section by the end of the ((twenty-year))20-year planning period when those properties:(a)(i) Have existing, functioning, nonpolluting on-site sewage systems;(ii) Have a periodic inspection program by a public agency to verify the on-site sewage systems function properly and do not pollute surface or groundwater; and(iii) Have no redevelopment capacity; or(b) Do not require sewer service because development densities are limited due to wetlands, floodplains, fish and wildlife habitats, or geological hazards.Sec. 13. RCW 36.70A.130 and 2025 c 269 s 5 and 2025 c 148 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter according to the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.(b)(i) A city or town located within a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may opt out of a full review and revisions of its comprehensive plan established in this section if the city or town meets the following criteria:(A) Has a population fewer than 500;(B) Is not located within 10 miles of a city with a population over 100,000;(C) Experienced a population growth rate of fewer than 10 percent in the preceding 10 years; and(D) Has provided the department with notice of its intent to participate in a partial review and revision of its comprehensive plan.(ii) The department shall review the population growth rate for a city or town participating in the partial review and revision of its comprehensive plan process at least three years before the periodic update is due as outlined in subsection (4) of this section and notify cities of their eligibility.(iii) A city or town that opts out of a full review and revision of its comprehensive plan must update its critical areas regulations and its capital facilities element and its transportation element.(c) Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter according to the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and the reasons therefor.(d) The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall include, but is not limited to, consideration of critical area ordinances and, if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the population allocated to a city or county from the most recent 10-year population forecast by the office of financial management.(e) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan.(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW 36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise, if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section or in accordance with the provisions of subsection (6) of this section. Amendments may be considered more frequently than once per year under the following circumstances:(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan. Subarea plans adopted under this subsection (2)(a)(i) must clarify, supplement, or implement jurisdiction-wide comprehensive plan policies, and may only be adopted if the cumulative impacts of the proposed plan are addressed by appropriate environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW;(ii) The development of an initial subarea plan for economic development located outside of the 100 year floodplain in a county that has completed a state-funded pilot project that is based on watershed characterization and local habitat assessment;(iii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW;(iv) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget;(v) The adoption of comprehensive plan amendments necessary to enact a planned action under RCW 43.21C.440, provided that amendments are considered in accordance with the public participation program established by the county or city under this subsection (2)(a) and all persons who have requested notice of a comprehensive plan update are given notice of the amendments and an opportunity to comment; or(vi) The adoption or amendment of any housing element necessary to receive a determination of compliance under RCW 36.70A.835.(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal of a comprehensive plan filed with the growth management hearings board or with the court.(3)(a) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall review, according to the schedules established in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, its designated urban growth area or areas, patterns of development occurring within the urban growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas.(b) The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding 20-year period. The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.(c) If, during the county's review under (a) of this subsection, the county determines revision of the urban growth area is not required to accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding 20-year period, but does determine that patterns of development have created pressure in areas that exceed available, developable lands within the urban growth area, the urban growth area or areas may be revised to accommodate identified patterns of development and likely future development pressure for the succeeding 20-year period if the following requirements are met:(i) The revised urban growth area may not result in an increase in the total surface areas of the urban growth area or areas;(ii) The county completes an agricultural impact statement as described in section 2(3)(a) of this act if the revised urban growth area contains land that is currently zoned for agricultural use;(iii) The areas added to the urban growth area are not or have not been designated as agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands of long-term commercial significance;(((iii)))(iv) Less than 15 percent of the areas added to the urban growth area are critical areas;(((iv)))(v) The areas added to the urban growth areas are suitable for urban growth;(((v)))(vi) The transportation element and capital facility plan element have identified the transportation facilities, and public facilities and services needed to serve the urban growth area and the funding to provide the transportation facilities and public facilities and services;(((vi)))(vii) The urban growth area is not larger than needed to accommodate the growth planned for the succeeding 20-year planning period and a reasonable land market supply factor;(((vii)))(viii) The areas removed from the urban growth area do not include urban growth or urban densities; and(((viii)))(ix) The revised urban growth area is contiguous, does not include holes or gaps, and will not increase pressures to urbanize rural or natural resource lands.(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (6) and (8) of this section, counties and cities shall take action to review and, if needed, revise their comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter as follows:(a) On or before June 30, 2015, for King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties and the cities within those counties;(b) On or before June 30, 2016, for Clallam, Clark, Island, Jefferson, Kitsap, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;(c) On or before June 30, 2017, for Benton, Chelan, Cowlitz, Douglas, Kittitas, Lewis, Skamania, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and(d) On or before June 30, 2018, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grant, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities within those counties.(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (6) and (8) of this section, following the review of comprehensive plans and development regulations required by subsection (4) of this section, counties and cities shall take action to review and, if needed, revise their comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter as follows:(a) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, on or before December 31, 2024, with the following review and, if needed, revision on or before June 30, 2034, and then every 10 years thereafter, for King, Kitsap, Pierce, and Snohomish counties and the cities within those counties;(b) On or before December 31, 2025, with the following review and, if needed, revision on or before June 30, 2035, and then every 10 years thereafter, for Clallam, Clark, Island, Jefferson, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties;(c) On or before December 31, 2026, with the following review and, if needed, revision, on or before June 30, 2036, and every 10 years thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Cowlitz, Douglas, Franklin, Kittitas, Skamania, Spokane, Walla Walla, and Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and(d) On or before June 30, 2027, and every 10 years thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Garfield, Grant, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, and Whitman counties and the cities within those counties.(6)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before the deadlines established in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they elect to do so.(b) A county that is subject to a deadline established in subsection (5)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this section at any time within the 24 months following the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section: The county has a population of less than 50,000 and has had its population increase by no more than 17 percent in the 10 years preceding the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section as of that date.(c) A city that is subject to a deadline established in subsection (5)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this section at any time within the 24 months following the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section: The city has a population of no more than 5,000 and has had its population increase by the greater of either no more than 100 persons or no more than 17 percent in the 10 years preceding the deadline established in subsection (5) of this section as of that date.(d) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances, comprehensive plans, and development regulations.(7)(a) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities that meet the following criteria may receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees under chapter 43.155 or 70A.135 RCW:(i) The county or city is in compliance with the deadlines in this section;(ii) The county or city demonstrates substantial progress towards compliance with the deadlines in this section for development regulations that protect critical areas. For the purposes of this subsection (7)(a)(ii), a county or city that is fewer than 12 months out of compliance with the deadlines in this section for development regulations that protect critical areas is making substantial progress towards compliance with the deadlines in this section; or(iii) The county or city demonstrates substantial progress towards compliance with the deadlines in this section for any housing element and any housing development regulations required to be submitted to the department for review under RCW 36.70A.835. For the purposes of this subsection (7)(a)(iii), a county or city that applies to the department for review within the timelines specified under RCW 36.70A.835 demonstrates substantial progress towards compliance with the deadlines in this section and is eligible for grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees under chapter 43.155 or 70A.135 RCW until the department or the growth management hearings board issues a final decision determining that the county's or city's housing element or any related housing development regulations are not in compliance with the laws and regulations identified in RCW 36.70A.835(7).(b) Only those counties and cities in compliance with the schedules in this section may receive preference for grants or loans subject to the provisions of RCW 43.17.250.(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this subsection, if a participating watershed is achieving benchmarks and goals for the protection of critical areas functions and values, the county is not required to update development regulations to protect critical areas as they specifically apply to agricultural activities in that watershed.(b) A county that has made the election under RCW 36.70A.710(1) may only adopt or amend development regulations to protect critical areas as they specifically apply to agricultural activities in a participating watershed if:(i) A work plan has been approved for that watershed in accordance with RCW 36.70A.725;(ii) The local watershed group for that watershed has requested the county to adopt or amend development regulations as part of a work plan developed under RCW 36.70A.720;(iii) The adoption or amendment of the development regulations is necessary to enable the county to respond to an order of the growth management hearings board or court;(iv) The adoption or amendment of development regulations is necessary to address a threat to human health or safety; or(v) Three or more years have elapsed since the receipt of funding.(c) Beginning 10 years from the date of receipt of funding, a county that has made the election under RCW 36.70A.710(1) must review and, if necessary, revise development regulations to protect critical areas as they specifically apply to agricultural activities in a participating watershed in accordance with the review and revision requirements and timeline in subsection (5) of this section. This subsection (8)(c) does not apply to a participating watershed that has determined under RCW 36.70A.720(2)(c)(ii) that the watershed's goals and benchmarks for protection have been met.(9)(a) Counties subject to planning deadlines established in subsection (5) of this section that are required or that choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and that meet either criteria of (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, and cities with a population of more than 6,000 as of April 1, 2021, within those counties, must provide to the department an implementation progress report detailing the progress they have achieved in implementing their comprehensive plan five years after the review and revision of their comprehensive plan. Once a county meets the criteria in (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, the implementation progress report requirements remain in effect thereafter for that county and the cities therein with populations greater than 6,000 as of April 1, 2021, even if the county later no longer meets either or both criteria. A county is subject to the implementation progress report requirement if it meets either of the following criteria on or after April 1, 2021:(i) The county has a population density of at least 100 people per square mile and a population of at least 200,000; or(ii) The county has a population density of at least 75 people per square mile and an annual growth rate of at least 1.75 percent as determined by the office of financial management.(b) The department shall adopt guidelines for indicators, measures, milestones, and criteria for use by counties and cities in the implementation progress report that must cover:(i) The implementation of previously adopted changes to the housing element and any effect those changes have had on housing affordability and availability within the jurisdiction;(ii) Permit processing timelines; and(iii) Progress toward implementing any actions required to achieve reductions to meet greenhouse gas and vehicle miles traveled requirements as provided for in any element of the comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.070.(c) If a city or county required to provide an implementation progress report under this subsection (9) has not implemented any specifically identified regulations, zoning and land use changes, or taken other legislative or administrative action necessary to implement any changes in the most recent periodic update in their comprehensive plan by the due date for the implementation progress report, the city or county must identify the need for such action in the implementation progress report. Cities and counties must adopt a work plan to implement any necessary regulations, zoning and land use changes, or take other legislative or administrative action identified in the implementation progress report and complete all work necessary for implementation within two years of submission of the implementation progress report.(10) Any county or city that is required by RCW 36.70A.095 to include in its comprehensive plan a climate change and resiliency element and that is also required by subsection (5)(a) of this section to review and, if necessary, revise its comprehensive plan on or before December 31, 2024, must update its transportation element and incorporate a climate change and resiliency element into its comprehensive plan as part of the first implementation progress report required by subsection (9) of this section if funds are appropriated and distributed by December 31, 2027, as required under RCW 36.70A.070(10).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.--- END ---